Florida, session 2026, SB1154.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 42 43 Section 1.âSection 468.502, Florida Statutes, is amended to 44 read: 45 468.502âPurpose and intent.âThe Legislature finds that the 46 practice of dietetics and the practice of nutrition or nutrition 47 counseling by unskilled and incompetent practitioners present 48 presents a danger to the public health and safety. The 49 Legislature further finds that it is difficult for the public to 50 make informed choices about dietitians and nutritionists and 51 that the consequences of wrong choices could seriously endanger 52 the public health and safety. The sole legislative purpose in 53 enacting this part is to ensure that every person who practices 54 medical nutrition therapy dietetics and nutrition or nutrition 55 counseling in this state meets minimum requirements for safe 56 practice. It is the legislative intent that any person 57 practicing as a dietitian or nutritionist dietetics and 58 nutrition or nutrition counseling who falls below minimum 59 competency or who otherwise presents a danger to the public be 60 prohibited from practicing in this state. It is also the intent 61 of the Legislature that the practice of medical nutrition 62 therapy counseling be authorized and regulated solely within the 63 limits expressly provided by this part and any rules adopted 64 pursuant thereto. 65 Section 2.âSection 468.503, Florida Statutes, is amended to 66 read: 67 468.503âDefinitions.âAs used in this part: 68 (1)ââBoardâ means the Board of Medicine. 69 (2)ââCommissionâ means the Commission on Dietetic 70 Registration, the credentialing agency of the Academy of 71 Nutrition and Dietetics. 72 (3)ââComplex,â with respect to a disease state, medical 73 condition, or clinical presentation, means requiring the 74 provision of medical nutrition therapy by a licensed dietitian 75 due to one or more of the following: 76 (a)âInstability of the patientâs health status. 77 (b)âThe presence of multiple or interacting comorbidities. 78 (c)âA high risk of complications or rapid clinical 79 deterioration. 80 (d)âThe need for intensive monitoring. 81 (e)âThe need for advanced nutrition interventions, 82 including therapeutic diets administered through enteral or 83 parenteral routes. 84 85 Complex disease states, medical conditions, or clinical 86 presentations include, but are not limited to, severe 87 malnutrition, organ failure, conditions requiring enteral or 88 parenteral nutrition, renal disease requiring dialysis, severe 89 metabolic disturbances, post-bariatric surgery care, and 90 critical illness. 91 (4)ââDegreeâ means a degree received from an educational 92 institution that at the time the degree was awarded was 93 accredited by a national institutional accrediting body for 94 higher education recognized by the Council for Higher Education 95 Accreditation, the United States Department of Education, or a 96 foreign equivalent approved by the board. 97 (5)ââDepartmentâ means the Department of Health. 98 (4)ââDieteticsâ means the integration and application of 99 the principles derived from the sciences of nutrition, 100 biochemistry, food, physiology, and management and from the 101 behavioral and social sciences to achieve and maintain a 102 personâs health throughout the personâs life. It is an integral 103 part of preventive, diagnostic, curative, and restorative health 104 care of individuals, groups, or both. 105 (5)ââDietetics and nutrition practiceâ shall include 106 assessing nutrition needs and status using appropriate data; 107 recommending appropriate dietary regimens, nutrition support, 108 and nutrient intake; ordering therapeutic diets; improving 109 health status through nutrition research, counseling, and 110 education; and developing, implementing, and managing nutrition 111 care systems, which includes, but is not limited to, evaluating, 112 modifying, and maintaining appropriate standards of high quality 113 in food and nutrition care services. 114 (6)ââDietetic technicianâ means a person who assists in the 115 provision of dietetic and nutrition services under the 116 supervision of a qualified professional. 117 (7)ââGeneral nonmedical nutrition informationâ means 118 information on any of the following: 119 (a)âPrinciples of human nutrition and food preparation. 120 (b)âPrinciples of self-care and a healthy relationship with 121 food. 122 (c)âEssential nutrients needed by the human body. 123 (d)âGeneral and nonindividualized recommended amounts of 124 essential nutrients in the human body. 125 (e)âActions of nutrients in the human body. 126 (f)âNonindividualized effects of deficiencies or excesses 127 of nutrients in the human body. 128 (g)âGeneral education on foods, herbs, and dietary 129 supplements that are good sources of essential nutrients in the 130 human body. 131 (8)ââLicensed dietitian dietitian/nutritionistâ means a 132 person licensed under s. 468.509(1) to engage in the practice of 133 dietetics and the practice of nutrition, including the provision 134 of medical nutrition therapy pursuant to s. 468.509. 135 (9)(8)ââLicensed nutrition counselorâ means a person 136 licensed pursuant to s. 468.51. 137 (10)ââLicensed nutritionistâ means a person licensed under 138 s. 468.509(2) to engage in the practice of nutrition, including 139 the provision of noncomplex medical nutrition therapy. 140 (11)ââMedical nutrition therapyâ means the provision of any 141 of the following nutrition care services for the purpose of 142 management or treatment of a disease or medical condition: 143 (a)âNutrition assessment. 144 (b)âNutrition diagnosis. 145 (c)âNutrition intervention. 146 (d)âNutrition monitoring and evaluation. 147 (12)ââMedical weight controlâ means medical nutrition 148 therapy provided for the purpose of reducing, maintaining, or 149 gaining weight. 150 (13)ââNoncomplex,â with respect to a disease state, medical 151 condition, or clinical presentation, means one that is stable or 152 well-managed, does not involve rapid clinical deterioration or 153 high-acuity care needs, and can be safely addressed through 154 medical nutrition therapy delivered in low-acuity outpatient 155 settings by a practitioner practicing within his or her 156 demonstrated level of competence. Noncomplex disease states, 157 medical conditions, or clinical presentations do not require 158 intensive monitoring, do not involve multiple interacting 159 comorbidities, and do not necessitate advanced interventions, 160 such as therapeutic diets delivered through enteral or 161 parenteral nutrition. 162 (14)ââNonmedical weight controlâ means nutrition care 163 services for the purpose of reducing, maintaining, or gaining 164 weight which do not constitute the treatment or management of a 165 disease or medical condition. The term includes weight control 166 services for healthy population groups to achieve or maintain a 167 healthy weight. 168 (15)(9)ââNutrition assessmentâ means the ongoing, dynamic, 169 and systematic process of ordering, obtaining, verifying, and 170 interpreting biochemical, anthropometric, physical, 171 nutrigenomic, and dietary data to make decisions about the 172 nature and cause of nutrition-related problems relative to 173 patient and community needs. Such assessment involves not only 174 initial data collection, but also reassessment and analysis of 175 patient or community needs and provides the foundation for 176 nutrition diagnosis and nutritional recommendations and orders. 177 Nutrition assessment may require ordering laboratory tests to 178 check and track nutritional status. The collection of nutrition 179 related data does not, by itself, constitute a nutrition 180 assessment. 181 (16)ââNutrition care processâ means the systematic problem 182 solving method that licensed dietitians use to critically think 183 and make decisions when providing medical nutrition therapy or 184 to address nutrition-related problems and provide safe and 185 effective care. The nutrition care process consists of four 186 distinct, but interrelated steps, including nutrition 187 assessment, nutrition diagnosis, nutrition intervention, and 188 nutrition monitoring and evaluation. 189 (17)ââNutrition care servicesâ means any part or all of the 190 following services provided within a systematic process of care: 191 (a)âAssessing and evaluating the nutritional needs of 192 individuals and groups and determining resources and constraints 193 in a practice setting, including ordering of nutrition-related 194 laboratory tests to check and track nutrition status. 195 (b)âIdentifying nutrition problems and establishing 196 priorities, goals, and objectives that meet nutritional needs 197 and are consistent with available resources and constraints. 198 (c)âCreating individualized dietary plans and issuing and 199 implementing orders to meet nutritional needs of healthy 200 individuals and individuals with diseases or medical conditions, 201 including ordering therapeutic diets and monitoring their 202 effectiveness. 203 (d)âDetermining and providing appropriate nutrition 204 intervention in health and disease, including nutrition 205 counseling on food and prescription drug interactions. 206 (e)âDeveloping, implementing, and managing nutrition care 207 systems. 208 (f)âEvaluating, making changes in, and maintaining 209 appropriate standards of quality in food and nutrition services 210 evaluation of the nutrition needs of individuals or groups, 211 using appropriate data to determine nutrient needs or status and 212 make appropriate nutrition recommendations. 213 (18)(10)ââNutrition counselingâ means a supportive process, 214 characterized by a collaborative counselor-patient relationship 215 with individuals or groups, to establish food and nutrition 216 priorities, goals, and individualized action plans and general 217 physical activity guidance, which process acknowledges and 218 fosters responsibility for self-care to promote health and 219 wellness or to treat or manage an existing disease or medical 220 condition advising and assisting individuals or groups on 221 appropriate nutrition intake by integrating information from the 222 nutrition assessment. 223 (19)ââNutrition diagnosisâ means identifying and labeling 224 nutrition problems managed and treated by a licensed dietitian 225 or licensed nutritionist but does not include a medical 226 diagnosis of the health status of an individual. 227 (20)ââNutrition interventionâ means purposefully planned 228 actions, including nutrition counseling, intended to positively 229 change a nutrition-related behavior, risk factor, environmental 230 condition, or aspect of health status of an individual and his 231 or her family or caregivers, target groups, or community at 232 large. The term includes approving, ordering, and monitoring 233 therapeutic diets and counseling on food and prescription drug 234 interactions. 235 (21)ââNutrition monitoring and evaluationâ means 236 identifying patient outcomes relevant to the nutrition 237 diagnosis, intervention plans, and goals and comparing those 238 outcomes with previous status, intervention goals, or a 239 reference standard to determine the progress made in achieving 240 desired outcomes of nutrition care and whether planned 241 interventions should be continued or revised. 242 (22)ââPatientâ means an individual who is the recipient of 243 nutrition care services from a person licensed under this part. 244 (23)ââPractice of dieteticsâ means the integration and 245 application of scientific principles derived from the study of 246 food, nutrition, biochemistry, metabolism, nutrigenomics, 247 physiology, pharmacology, food systems, food management, and 248 behavioral and social sciences to achieve and maintain optimal 249 nutrition status of individuals and groups across their 250 lifespans. The term includes the provision of nutrition care 251 services, including medical nutrition therapy, delivered in 252 person or through telehealth, to prevent, manage, or treat 253 complex diseases or medical conditions and promote wellness in 254 inpatient and outpatient settings. The term also includes 255 developing and ordering therapeutic diets, through oral, 256 enteral, and parenteral routes, and providing other advanced 257 medical nutrition therapy and related support activities 258 consistent with current competencies required of academic and 259 supervised practice programs accredited by the Accreditation 260 Council for Education in Nutrition and Dietetics and in 261 accordance with the commissionâs Scope and Standards of Practice 262 for the Registered Dietitian. 263 (24)ââPractice of nutritionâ means the integration and 264 application of scientific principles derived from the study of 265 nutrition science, cellular and systemic metabolism, 266 biochemistry, physiology, and behavioral sciences to support and 267 maintain health throughout the lifespan. The term includes the 268 provision of nutrition care services, including medical 269 nutrition therapy, delivered in person or through telehealth, 270 for the prevention, management, or treatment of noncomplex 271 diseases and medical conditions in low-acuity outpatient 272 settings, and for the promotion of wellness. The term also 273 includes, consistent with the practitionerâs level of 274 competence, ordering oral therapeutic diets, ordering medical 275 laboratory tests related to nutrition interventions, and 276 recommending vitamin, mineral, and other dietary supplements. 277 The term excludes the provision of medical nutrition therapy for 278 complex conditions and the delivery of medical nutrition therapy 279 in inpatient or high-acuity outpatient settings. 280 (25)ââQualified supervisorâ means an individual meeting the 281 requirements of s. 468.516 who provides supervision and assumes 282 full professional responsibility for the work of the supervisee 283 by verifying, directing, and approving the provided nutrition 284 care services, medical nutrition therapy, and other work being 285 supervised. 286 (11)ââPreprofessional experience componentâ means a planned 287 and continuous supervised practice experience in dietetics or 288 nutrition. 289 (26)(12)ââRegistered dietitianâ or âregistered 290 dietitian/nutritionistâ means a person credentialed as a 291 registered dietitian or a registered dietitian nutritionist by 292 the commission or its successor organization and authorized to 293 use such title and the corresponding abbreviations âR.D.â or 294 âR.D.N.â an individual registered with the commission. 295 (27)ââTelehealthâ means the use of electronic information 296 and telecommunications technologies to provide services under 297 this part between a practitioner in one location and an 298 individual in another location to support clinical health care, 299 public health, patient health-related education, and health 300 administration. 301 (28)ââTherapeutic dietâ means a diet intervention ordered 302 by a physician or other authorized provider, including a 303 licensed dietitian or, for oral diets only, a licensed 304 nutritionist. The term includes provision of food, fluids, or 305 nutrients by oral, enteral, or parenteral routes, or the 306 provision of mechanically altered food when medically indicated, 307 for the treatment of a disease or clinical condition to modify, 308 eliminate, decrease, or increase specific macronutrients or 309 micronutrients. 310 (29)ââUnrestricted practice of medical nutrition therapyâ 311 means the provision of medical nutrition therapy by an 312 individual who is responsible for his or her own practice or 313 treatment procedures. 314 Section 3.âSection 468.504, Florida Statutes, is amended to 315 read: 316 468.504âLicense required.âExcept as otherwise provided in 317 this part, a person may not do any of the following: 318 (1)âNo person may Engage in or offer to provide medical 319 nutrition therapy unless the person is licensed under this part. 320 (2)âDesignate or hold himself or herself out as a licensed 321 dietitian or use or assume the titles âlicensed dietitian,â 322 âdietitian,â âdietitian nutritionist,â or any other title 323 indicating that the person is a licensed dietitian, or append to 324 or use in conjunction with that personâs name the letters 325 âL.D.,â unless the person is a licensed dietitian under s. 326 468.509(1). 327 (3)âUse or assume the title âlicensed nutritionist,â or 328 append to or use in conjunction with that personâs name the 329 letters âL.N.,â unless the person is a licensed nutritionist 330 under s. 468.509(2) or a licensed nutrition counselor under s. 331 468.51. 332 (4)âDesignate or hold himself or herself out as a 333 nutritionist or use or assume the title ânutritionist,â unless 334 the person is licensed under for remuneration in dietetics and 335 nutrition practice or nutrition counseling or hold himself or 336 herself out as a practitioner of dietetics and nutrition 337 practice or nutrition counseling unless the person is licensed 338 in accordance with the provisions of this part. 339 Section 4.âSection 468.505, Florida Statutes, is amended to 340 read: 341 468.505âExemptions; exceptions.â 342 (1)âNothing in This part may not be construed as 343 prohibiting or restricting the practice, services, or activities 344 of: 345 (a)âA person licensed in this state under chapter 457, 346 chapter 458, chapter 459, chapter 460, chapter 461, chapter 462, 347 chapter 463, part I of chapter 464, chapter 465, chapter 466, 348 chapter 480, chapter 490, or chapter 491, when engaging in the 349 profession or occupation for which he or she is licensed, or of 350 any person employed by and under the supervision of the licensee 351 when rendering services within the scope of the profession or 352 occupation of the licensee. 353 (b)âA dietitian or nutritionist serving in the armed forces 354 or the United States Public Health Service or employed by the 355 Veterans Administration and who is engaging in the practice of 356 medical nutrition therapy or using government-issued titles, 357 provided such practice or title use is related to such service 358 or employment person employed as a dietitian by the government 359 of the United States, if the person engages in dietetics solely 360 under direction or control of the organization by which the 361 person is employed. 362 (c)âA person employed as a cooperative extension home 363 economist. 364 (d)âA person pursuing a course of study leading to a degree 365 in dietetics and nutrition from a program or school accredited 366 pursuant to s. 468.509 s. 468.509(3), if the activities and 367 services constitute a part of a supervised course of study, the 368 person is under the direction of a qualified supervisor as 369 specified in s. 468.516, and if the person is designated by a 370 title that clearly indicates the personâs status as a student or 371 trainee. 372 (d)(e)âA person fulfilling a the supervised experience 373 component under of s. 468.509, if the activities and services 374 constitute a part of the experience necessary to meet the 375 requirements of s. 468.509, the person practices under this 376 paragraph only while supervised by a qualified supervisor as 377 specified in s. 468.516, and the person is designated by a title 378 that clearly indicates the personâs status as a student or 379 trainee. 380 (e)(f)âAny dietitian or nutritionist from another state 381 practicing medical nutrition therapy dietetics or nutrition 382 incidental to a course of study when taking or giving a 383 postgraduate course or other course of study in this state, 384 provided such dietitian or nutritionist is licensed in another 385 jurisdiction or is a registered dietitian or holds an 386 appointment on the faculty of a school accredited pursuant to s. 387 468.509 s. 468.509(3). 388 (f)(g)âA person who markets or distributes food, food 389 materials, or dietary supplements, or any person who engages in 390 the explanation of the use and benefits of those products or the 391 preparation of those products, if that person does not engage in 392 the practice of medical nutrition therapy and the person does 393 not represent himself or herself using titles or abbreviations 394 as prohibited under s. 468.504 for a fee in dietetics and 395 nutrition practice or nutrition counseling. 396 (g)(h)âA person who markets or distributes food, food 397 materials, or dietary supplements, or any person who engages in 398 the explanation of the use of those products or the preparation 399 of those products, as an employee of an establishment permitted 400 pursuant to chapter 465, if that person does not engage in the 401 practice of medical nutrition therapy and the person does not 402 represent himself or herself using titles or abbreviations as 403 prohibited under s. 468.504. 404 (h)(i)âA person who is employed by the state, a county, a 405 municipal agency, or any other political subdivision, or a 406 person who contracts with any of the foregoing, for the purposes 407 of providing nutrition care services for the Women, Infants, and 408 Children program, and who uses the title of ânutritionistâ in 409 the course of his or her official duties An educator who is in 410 the employ of a nonprofit organization approved by the council; 411 a federal, state, county, or municipal agency, or other 412 political subdivision; an elementary or secondary school; or an 413 accredited institution of higher education the definition of 414 which, as provided in s. 468.509(3), applies to other sections 415 of this part, insofar as the activities and services of the 416 educator are part of such employment. 417 (i)(j)âPersons who do not represent themselves using titles 418 or abbreviations as prohibited under s. 468.504 when providing 419 medical weight control for obesity as part of any of the 420 following: 421 1.âAn instructional program that has been approved in 422 writing by at least one of the following: 423 a.âA licensed nutritionist or licensed dietitian; or 424 b.âA health care practitioner licensed or certified in this 425 state whose authorized scope of practice includes medical 426 nutrition therapy. 427 2.âA plan of care that is overseen by a health care 428 practitioner licensed in this state whose scope of practice 429 otherwise authorizes the health care practitioner to provide and 430 delegate medical nutrition therapy services, as long as the 431 medical weight control services are not discretionary and do not 432 require the exercise of professional judgment Any person who 433 provides weight control services or related weight control 434 products, provided the program has been reviewed by, 435 consultation is available from, and no program change can be 436 initiated without prior approval by a licensed 437 dietitian/nutritionist, a dietitian or nutritionist licensed in 438 another state that has licensure requirements considered by the 439 council to be at least as stringent as the requirements for 440 licensure under this part, or a registered dietitian. 441 (j)(k)âAn out-of-state dietitian or nutritionist who 442 provides medical nutrition therapy services through telehealth 443 to a patient located in this state, if the out-of-state 444 practitioner is a dietitian or nutritionist licensed or 445 certified in good standing in any state or territory and 446 provides medical nutrition therapy services through telehealth: 447 1.âIn consultation with a medical nutrition therapy 448 practitioner licensed in this state who has a practitioner 449 patient relationship with the patient; 450 2.âFor a patient with whom the practitioner has a current 451 practitioner-patient relationship, and the patient is 452 temporarily present in this state; or 453 3.âPursuant to a current practitioner-patient relationship, 454 and such care is limited to temporary or short-term follow-up 455 medical nutrition therapy services to ensure continuity of care. 456 457 By engaging in telehealth with a patient located in this state, 458 a dietitian or nutritionist otherwise exempted from licensure 459 under this paragraph consents to application of the laws and 460 rules of this state governing dietitians and nutritionists, the 461 jurisdiction of this state, and the jurisdiction of the 462 Dietetics and Nutrition Practice Council A person employed by a 463 hospital licensed under chapter 395, by a nursing home licensed 464 under part II of chapter 400, by an assisted living facility 465 licensed under chapter 429, or by a continuing care facility 466 certified under chapter 651, if the person is employed in 467 compliance with the laws and rules adopted thereunder regarding 468 the operation of its dietetic department. 469 (k)(l)âA person employed by a nursing facility exempt from 470 licensing under s. 395.002(12), or a person exempt from 471 licensing under s. 464.022. 472 (l)(m)âA person who does not represent himself or herself 473 using titles or abbreviations as prohibited under s. 468.504, 474 including a dietetic technician who assists with the provision 475 of medical nutrition therapy, if the person performs only 476 support activities that are not discretionary and that do not 477 require the exercise of professional judgment for their 478 performance and the person is directly supervised by a licensed 479 dietitian, licensed nutritionist, or a health care practitioner 480 licensed in this state acting within the scope of such 481 practitionerâs license A person employed as a dietetic 482 technician. 483 (m)(n)âA person who provides individualized nutrition 484 recommendations for the wellness and primary prevention of 485 chronic disease, health coaching, holistic and wellness 486 education, guidance, motivation, behavior change management, 487 services for nonmedical weight control, or other nutrition care 488 services, if all of the following conditions apply: 489 1.âThe services do not constitute medical nutrition 490 therapy. 491 2.âThe person does not represent himself or herself using 492 titles or abbreviations as prohibited under s. 468.504. 493 3.âThe person does not hold himself or herself out as 494 licensed or qualified to engage in the practice of medical 495 nutrition therapy Any person who provides information, wellness 496 recommendations, or advice concerning nutrition, or who markets 497 food, food materials, or dietary supplements for remuneration, 498 if such person does not provide such services to a person under 499 the direct care and supervision of a medical doctor for a 500 disease or medical condition requiring nutrition intervention, 501 not including obesity or weight loss, and does not represent 502 himself or herself as a dietitian, licensed dietitian, 503 registered dietitian, nutritionist, licensed nutritionist, 504 nutrition counselor, or licensed nutrition counselor, or use any 505 word, letter, symbol, or insignia indicating or implying that he 506 or she is a dietitian, nutritionist, or nutrition counselor. 507 (2)âNothing in This part may not be construed to prohibit 508 or limit any person from the free dissemination of information, 509 or from conducting a class or seminar or giving a speech, 510 related to nutrition. 511 (3)âThe provisions of This part has have no application to 512 the practice of the religious tenets of any church in this 513 state. 514 (4)âThis part may not be construed to prohibit an 515 individual from identifying himself or herself by an earned, 516 federally trademarked nutrition credential. However, such 517 identification does not authorize the individual to engage in 518 the practice of medical nutrition therapy or identify using the 519 general titles of âdietitian,â âdietitian nutritionist,â or 520 ânutritionistâ unless the individual is also licensed under this 521 part. Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, an 522 individual registered by the commission has the right to use the 523 title âRegistered Dietitianâ or âRegistered 524 Dietitian/Nutritionist,â and the designation âR.D.â or âR.D.N.â 525 An individual certified by the Certification Board for Nutrition 526 Specialists has the right to use the title âCertified Nutrition 527 Specialistâ and the designation âCNS,â and an individual 528 certified by the American Clinical Board of Nutrition has the 529 right to use the title âDiplomate of the American Clinical Board 530 of Nutritionâ and use the designation âDACBN.â 531 Section 5.âSection 468.506, Florida Statutes, is amended to 532 read: 533 468.506âDietetics and Nutrition Practice Council.âThere is 534 created the Dietetics and Nutrition Practice Council under the 535 supervision of the board. The council shall consist of three 536 dietitians and one nutritionist four persons licensed under this 537 part and one consumer who is 60 years of age or older. Council 538 members shall be appointed by the board. Licensed members shall 539 be appointed based on the proportion of licensees within each of 540 the respective disciplines. Members shall be appointed for 4 541 year staggered terms. In order to be eligible for appointment, 542 each licensed member must have been a licensee under this part 543 for at least 3 years prior to his or her appointment. No council 544 member shall serve more than two successive terms. The board may 545 delegate such powers and duties to the council as it may deem 546 proper to carry out the operations and procedures necessary to 547 effectuate the provisions of this part. However, the powers and 548 duties delegated to the council by the board must encompass the 549 practice of both dietetics and nutrition practice and nutrition 550 counseling. Any time there is a vacancy on the council, any 551 professional association composed of persons licensed under this 552 part may recommend licensees to fill the vacancy to the board in 553 a number at least twice the number of vacancies to be filled, 554 and the board may appoint from the submitted list, in its 555 discretion, any of those persons so recommended. Any 556 professional association composed of persons licensed under this 557 part may file an appeal regarding a council appointment with the 558 State Surgeon General, whose decision shall be final. The board 559 shall fix council membersâ compensation and pay their expenses 560 in the same manner as provided in s. 456.011. 561 Section 6.âSection 468.509, Florida Statutes, is amended to 562 read: 563 468.509âDietitian and nutritionist Dietitian/nutritionist; 564 requirements for licensure.â 565 (1)âTo be licensed as a dietitian, a person must apply to 566 the department on forms furnished by the department and 567 demonstrate to the boardâs satisfaction that the applicant is 568 capable and professionally competent to safely engage in the 569 practice of dietetics and nutrition. The department shall issue 570 a license to each applicant who submits a completed application, 571 remits the applicable fee, submits to background screening in 572 accordance with s. 456.0135, and whom the board certifies as 573 meeting all of the following criteria: 574 (a)âThe applicant submitted proof of completion of all the 575 following educational, supervised practice experience, and 576 examination requirements: 577 1.âObtained a masterâs degree or doctoral degree in a 578 program of study accredited by the Accreditation Council for 579 Education in Nutrition and Dietetics, or its successor 580 organization. 581 2.âSatisfactorily completed a planned, documented, 582 preprofessional experience component in the practice of 583 dietetics and practice of nutrition approved by the examining 584 board and accredited by the Accreditation Council for Education 585 in Nutrition and Dietetics, or its successor organization, which 586 involved at least 1,000 hours of supervised practice experience 587 under the supervision of a qualified supervisor as specified in 588 s. 468.516. An applicant must have completed the preprofessional 589 experience under this subparagraph within 5 years after 590 completing the program of study under subparagraph 1. unless the 591 examining board, for extraordinary circumstances, granted an 592 extension for additional time. 593 3.âPassed the registration examination for dietitians 594 administered by the Commission on Dietetic Registration, or its 595 successor organization. If passage of the examination occurred 596 more than 5 years before the application, the applicant must 597 demonstrate completion of 75 hours of continuing education 598 meeting the continuing education criteria of the board for each 599 5-year period that has lapsed since the passage of such 600 examination. 601 (b)âThe applicant submits proof of holding a valid current 602 registration with the Commission on Dietetic Registration, or 603 its successor organization, which gives the applicant the right 604 to use the term âregistered dietitian,â âregistered dietitian 605 nutritionist,â âR.D.,â or âR.D.N.â 606 (2)âTo be licensed as a nutritionist, a person must apply 607 to the department on forms furnished by the department and 608 demonstrate to the boardâs satisfaction that the applicant is 609 capable and professionally competent to safely engage in the 610 practice of nutrition. The department shall issue a license to 611 each applicant who submits a completed application, remits the 612 applicable fee, submits to background screening in accordance 613 with s. 456.0135, and whom the board certifies as meeting all of 614 the following educational, supervised practice experience, and 615 examination requirements: 616 (a)âHas obtained a masterâs or doctoral degree with a major 617 in human nutrition, foods and nutrition, community nutrition, 618 public health nutrition, nutrition education, nutrition, 619 nutrition science, clinical nutrition, applied clinical 620 nutrition, nutrition counseling, nutrition and functional 621 medicine, nutritional biochemistry, nutrition and integrative 622 health, or a comparable major, or a doctoral degree or validated 623 foreign equivalent, in a field of clinical health care. 624 Regardless of the course of study, the applicant must have 625 completed coursework leading to competence in noncomplex medical 626 nutrition therapy, which includes, but is not limited to: 627 1.âFifteen semester hours of courses on clinical or life 628 sciences, including at least three semester hours in human 629 anatomy and physiology or the equivalent; and 630 2.âFifteen semester hours of courses on nutrition and 631 metabolism, including at least six semester hours in 632 biochemistry. 633 (b)âHas completed a planned, documented, and continuous 634 preprofessional experience component demonstrating competence in 635 the practice of nutrition, which is approved by the examining 636 board and involved at least 1,000 hours of supervised practice 637 experience under the supervision of a qualified supervisor, with 638 at least 200 hours each in the practice areas of nutrition 639 assessment, nutrition intervention, and nutrition monitoring and 640 evaluation. An applicant must have completed the preprofessional 641 experience component within 5 years after completing the course 642 of study under paragraph (a) unless the examining board, for 643 extraordinary circumstances, granted an extension for additional 644 time. To satisfy the requirements of this paragraph, the 645 preprofessional experience component must be determined by the 646 board to have prepared the applicant to provide nutrition care 647 services for various populations of diverse cultures and genders 648 and across the life cycle and to be able to competently 649 formulate actionable medical nutrition therapies and 650 interventions, education, counseling, and ongoing care for the 651 prevention, modulation, and management of a range of noncomplex 652 medical conditions. 653 (c)1.âHas passed the certified nutrition specialist 654 examination administered by the Board for Certification of 655 Nutrition Specialists, or its successor organization, or an 656 equivalent examination on all aspects of the practice of 657 nutrition which has been reviewed under a program that requires 658 a masterâs or higher level degree, is accredited by the National 659 Commission for Certifying Agencies, and is approved by the 660 examining board. If passage of the examination occurred more 661 than 5 years before the application, the applicant must 662 demonstrate completion of 75 hours of continuing education 663 meeting the continuing education criteria of the board for each 664 5-year period that has elapsed since the passage of such 665 examination; or 666 2.âHolds a valid current certification with the Board for 667 Certification of Nutrition Specialists, or its successor 668 organization, which gives the applicant the right to use the 669 title âcertified nutrition specialist.â 670 (3)âAll persons licensed or who have applied for licensure 671 before July 1, 2026, remain licensed, eligible for reactivation 672 of licensure, or eligible for licensure, as applicable, under 673 the requirements in place at the time of application, so long as 674 the applicant or licensee remains in good standing and maintains 675 an active or inactive license, as applicable. 676 (a)âAny person who is licensed as a dietitian/nutritionist 677 as of July 1, 2026, must be issued a license to practice as a 678 dietitian without meeting any additional requirements so long as 679 such person holds the registered dietitian credential issued by 680 the Commission on Dietetic Registration. 681 (b)âAny person who is licensed as a dietitian/nutritionist 682 as of July 1, 2026, and does not hold the registered dietitian 683 credential issued by the Commission on Dietetic Registration 684 must be issued a license to practice as a nutritionist without 685 meeting any additional requirements. 686 (c)âAny person who is licensed as a nutrition counselor as 687 of July 1, 2026, must be issued a license to practice as a 688 nutritionist without meeting any additional requirements Any 689 person desiring to be licensed as a dietitian/nutritionist shall 690 apply to the department to take the licensure examination. 691 (2)âApplicants for licensure must also submit to background 692 screening in accordance with s. 456.0135. 693 (3)âThe department shall examine any applicant who the 694 board certifies has completed the application form, submitted to 695 background screening, and remitted the application and 696 examination fees specified in s. 468.508 and who: 697 (a)1.âPossesses a baccalaureate or postbaccalaureate degree 698 with a major course of study in human nutrition, food and 699 nutrition, dietetics, or food management, or an equivalent major 700 course of study, from a school or program accredited, at the 701 time of the applicantâs graduation, by the appropriate 702 accrediting agency recognized by the Commission on Recognition 703 of Postsecondary Accreditation and the United States Department 704 of Education; and 705 2.âHas completed a preprofessional experience component of 706 not less than 900 hours or has education or experience 707 determined to be equivalent by the board; or 708 (b)1.âHas an academic degree, from a foreign country, that 709 has been validated by an accrediting agency approved by the 710 United States Department of Education as equivalent to the 711 baccalaureate or postbaccalaureate degree conferred by a 712 regionally accredited college or university in the United 713 States; 714 2.âHas completed a major course of study in human 715 nutrition, food and nutrition, dietetics, or food management; 716 and 717 3.âHas completed a preprofessional experience component of 718 not less than 900 hours or has education or experience 719 determined to be equivalent by the board. 720 (4)âThe board shall waive the examination requirement for 721 an applicant who presents evidence satisfactory to the board 722 that the applicant is: 723 (a)âA registered dietitian or registered 724 dietitian/nutritionist who is registered with the commission and 725 complies with the qualifications under this section; or 726 (b)âA certified nutrition specialist who is certified by 727 the Certification Board for Nutrition Specialists or who is a 728 Diplomate of the American Clinical Board of Nutrition and 729 complies with the qualifications under this section. 730 (5)âThe department shall license as a 731 dietitian/nutritionist any applicant who has remitted the 732 initial licensure fee and has passed the examination in 733 accordance with this section. 734 Section 7.âSection 468.51, Florida Statutes, is amended to 735 read: 736 468.51âNutrition counselor; renewal of licensure.âAny 737 person previously certified as qualified by the board and 738 holding a license to practice as a nutrition counselor in this 739 state which was issued during the period from July 1, 1988, to 740 March 30, 1997, based upon documentation that the person was 741 employed as a practitioner of nutrition counseling previous to 742 and on April 1, 1988, shall be eligible to renew his or her 743 license as a nutritionist pursuant to s. 468.514. 744 Section 8.âSection 468.511, Florida Statutes, is amended to 745 read: 746 468.511âDietitian/nutritionist; Temporary permit.â 747 (1)âThe board may issue a temporary permit for an 748 individual to engage in the practice of dietetics and the 749 practice of nutrition under the supervision of a licensed 750 dietitian upon filing an application with appropriate fees and 751 submission of evidence of successful completion of the education 752 and preprofessional experience requirements for dietitian 753 licensure provided for in s. 468.509(1). 754 (2)âThe board may issue a temporary permit for an 755 individual to engage in the practice of nutrition under the 756 supervision of a licensed dietitian or licensed nutritionist 757 upon filing an application with appropriate fees and submission 758 of evidence of successful completion of the education and 759 supervised practice requirements for nutritionist licensure 760 provided for in s. 468.509(2) A temporary permit to practice 761 dietetics and nutrition may be issued by the board on the filing 762 of an application, payment of a temporary permit fee, and the 763 submission of evidence of the successful completion of the 764 educational requirement under s. 468.509. The initial 765 application shall be signed by the supervising licensee. 766 (2)âA person practicing under a temporary permit shall be 767 under the supervision and direction of a licensed 768 dietitian/nutritionist. 769 (3)âA temporary permit expires shall expire 1 year after 770 from the date of issuance. 771 (4)âThe board may grant one extension of a temporary permit 772 may be granted for good cause shown. 773 (5)âIf the board determines that an applicant is qualified 774 to be licensed by endorsement under s. 468.513, the board may 775 issue the applicant a temporary permit to practice dietetics and 776 nutrition until the next board meeting at which license 777 applications are to be considered, but not for a longer period 778 of time. 779 (6)âIf the board determines that an applicant has not 780 passed an examination recognized by the board and is not 781 qualified to be licensed by endorsement, but has otherwise met 782 all the requirements of s. 468.509 and has made application for 783 the next scheduled examination, the board may issue the 784 applicant a temporary permit allowing him or her to practice 785 dietetics and nutrition under the supervision of a licensed 786 dietitian/nutritionist until notification of the results of the 787 examination. 788 Section 9.âSection 468.512, Florida Statutes, is amended to 789 read: 790 468.512âLicense to be displayed.â 791 (1)(a)âA licensed dietitian/nutritionist may use the words 792 âdietitian,â âlicensed dietitian,â ânutritionist,â or âlicensed 793 nutritionist,â in connection with the licenseeâs name or place 794 of business, to denote licensure under this part. 795 (b)âA licensed nutrition counselor may use the words 796 ânutrition counselor,â âlicensed nutrition counselor,â 797 ânutritionist,â or âlicensed nutritionist,â in connection with 798 the licenseeâs name or place of business, to denote licensure 799 under this part. 800 (2)âEach person to whom a license is issued a license under 801 this part shall keep such license conspicuously displayed in his 802 or her office, place of business, or place of employment and, 803 whenever required, shall exhibit such license to any member or 804 authorized representative of the board. 805 Section 10.âSection 468.513, Florida Statutes, is amended 806 to read: 807 468.513âDietitian/nutritionist; Licensure by endorsement. 808 The department shall issue a license to practice as a dietitian 809 or nutritionist dietetics and nutrition by endorsement to any 810 applicant who submits to background screening in accordance with 811 s. 456.0135 and meets the requirements for licensure by 812 endorsement under s. 456.0145, upon receipt of a completed 813 application and the fee specified in s. 468.508. 814 Section 11.âSection 468.516, Florida Statutes, is amended 815 to read: 816 468.516âQualified supervisors Practice requirements.â 817 (1)âTo be a qualified supervisor for purposes of this part, 818 an individual must meet all the following requirements: 819 (a)âOnly supervise a clinical activity or nutrition care 820 service that the individual is qualified and authorized to 821 perform. 822 (b)âDevelop and carry out a program for advancing and 823 optimizing the quality of care provided by the student or 824 trainee being supervised. A qualified supervisor and a student 825 or trainee being supervised shall identify and document goals 826 for supervised practice experience, the assignment of clinical 827 tasks as appropriate to the superviseeâs evolving level of 828 competence, the superviseeâs relationship and access to the 829 qualified supervisor, and a process for evaluating the studentâs 830 or traineeâs performance. 831 (c)âOversee the activities of and approve and accept 832 responsibility for the nutrition care services rendered by the 833 student or trainee. 834 (d)âAt a minimum, be physically on-site and present where 835 the supervisee is providing nutrition care services or be 836 immediately and continuously available to the supervisee by 837 means of two-way, real-time audiovisual technology that allows 838 for the direct, contemporaneous interaction by sight and sound 839 between the qualified supervisor and the supervisee. If the 840 qualified supervisor assigns a nutrition care service to a 841 supervisee which is to be provided in a setting where the 842 qualified supervisor is not routinely present, the qualified 843 supervisor must ensure that the means and methods of supervision 844 are adequate to ensure appropriate patient care, which may 845 include synchronous videoconferencing or another method of 846 communication and oversight which is appropriate to the care 847 setting and the education and experience of the supervisee. 848 (e)âReview on a regular basis the charts, records, and 849 clinical notes of the supervisee and maintain responsibility for 850 the superviseeâs clinical recordkeeping. 851 (f)âBe available to render assistance during the provision 852 of nutrition care services when requested by the patient, or 853 arrange for another qualified practitioner lawfully able to 854 render nutrition care services to be available in the absence of 855 the qualified supervisor. 856 (g)âLimit the assignment of nutrition care services to 857 those services that are within the training and experience of 858 the supervisee and customary to the practice of the qualified 859 supervisor. 860 (2)âTo supervise the provision of medical nutrition 861 therapy, a qualified supervisor, in addition to meeting the 862 requirements of subsection (1), must meet one of the following 863 requirements: 864 (a)âBe licensed as a dietitian or nutritionist or other 865 health care practitioner whose scope of practice includes 866 medical nutrition therapy in the state where such supervised 867 practice experience takes place. 868 (b)âMeet the exemption requirements of s. 468.505(1)(b). 869 (c)âMeet such other criteria as the board may establish by 870 rule for instances when a state where the supervised practice 871 takes place does not provide for licensure or certification of 872 dietitians or nutritionists. 873 (1)(a)âA licensee under this part shall not implement a 874 dietary plan for a condition for which the patient is under the 875 active care of a physician licensed under chapter 458 or chapter 876 459, without the oral or written dietary order of the referring 877 physician. In the event the licensee is unable to obtain 878 authorization or consultation after a good faith effort to 879 obtain it from the physician, the licensee may use professional 880 discretion in providing nutrition services until authorization 881 or consultation is obtained from the physician. 882 (b)âThe licensee shall refer a patient to a physician 883 licensed under chapter 458 or chapter 459 upon the recognition 884 of a condition within the scope of practice as authorized under 885 chapter 458 or chapter 459, unless the patient has been referred 886 by or is currently being treated by a physician licensed under 887 chapter 458 or chapter 459. 888 (2)(a)âA licensee under this part shall not implement a 889 dietary plan for a chiropractic condition for which the patient 890 is under the active care of a chiropractic physician licensed 891 under chapter 460, without the oral or written dietary order of 892 the referring chiropractic physician. In the event the licensee 893 is unable to obtain authorization or consultation after a good 894 faith effort to obtain it from the chiropractic physician, the 895 licensee may use professional discretion in providing nutrition 896 services until authorization or consultation is obtained from 897 the chiropractic physician. 898 (b)âThe licensee shall refer a patient to a chiropractic 899 physician licensed under chapter 460 upon the recognition of a 900 condition within the scope of practice as authorized under 901 chapter 460, unless the patient has been referred or is 902 currently being treated by a chiropractic physician licensed 903 under chapter 460. 904 (3)âThis section does not preclude a licensed 905 dietitian/nutritionist from independently ordering a therapeutic 906 diet if otherwise authorized to order such a diet in this state. 907 Section 12.âSection 468.517, Florida Statutes, is amended 908 to read: 909 468.517âProhibitions; penalties.â 910 (1)âA person may not knowingly: 911 (a)âEngage in the practice of medical nutrition therapy 912 dietetics and nutrition practice or nutrition counseling for 913 remuneration unless the person is licensed under this part or is 914 otherwise exempt under s. 468.505; 915 (b)âUse titles as specified in s. 468.504 the name or title 916 âdietitian,â âlicensed dietitian,â ânutritionist,â âlicensed 917 nutritionist,â ânutrition counselor,â or âlicensed nutrition 918 counselor,â or any other words, letters, abbreviations, or 919 insignia indicating or implying that he or she is a dietitian, 920 nutritionist, or nutrition counselor, or otherwise hold himself 921 or herself out as such, unless the person holds the applicable 922 is the holder of a valid license issued under this part; 923 (c)âPresent as his or her own the license of another; 924 (d)âGive false or forged evidence to the board or a member 925 thereof; 926 (e)âUse or attempt to use a license that has been 927 suspended, revoked, or placed on inactive or delinquent status; 928 (f)âEmploy unlicensed persons to engage in medical 929 nutrition therapy dietetics and nutrition practice or nutrition 930 counseling; or 931 (g)âConceal information relative to any violation of this 932 part. 933 (2)âA person who violates any provision of this section 934 commits a misdemeanor of the first degree, punishable as 935 provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083. 936 Section 13.âSection 468.518, Florida Statutes, is amended 937 to read: 938 468.518âGrounds for disciplinary action.â 939 (1)âThe following acts constitute grounds for denial of a 940 license or disciplinary action, as specified in s. 456.072(2): 941 (a)âViolating any provision of this part, any board or 942 department rule adopted pursuant thereto, or any lawful order of 943 the board or department previously entered in a disciplinary 944 hearing held pursuant to this part, or failing to comply with a 945 lawfully issued subpoena of the department. The provisions of 946 this paragraph also apply to any order or subpoena previously 947 issued by the Department of Health during its period of 948 regulatory control over this part. 949 (b)âBeing unable to engage in the practice of dietetics and 950 nutrition practice or nutrition counseling with reasonable skill 951 and safety to patients by reason of illness or use of alcohol, 952 drugs, narcotics, chemicals, or any other type of material or as 953 a result of any mental or physical condition. 954 1.âA licensee whose license is suspended or revoked 955 pursuant to this paragraph shall, at reasonable intervals, be 956 given an opportunity to demonstrate that he or she can resume 957 the competent practice of dietetics or nutrition, as applicable, 958 and nutrition or nutrition counseling with reasonable skill and 959 safety to patients. 960 2.âNeither the record of the proceeding nor the orders 961 entered by the board in any proceeding under this paragraph may 962 be used against a licensee in any other proceeding. 963 (c)âAttempting to procure or procuring a license to 964 practice dietetics and nutrition or nutrition counseling by 965 fraud or material misrepresentation of material fact. 966 (d)âHaving a license to practice dietetics and nutrition or 967 nutrition counseling revoked, suspended, or otherwise acted 968 against, including the denial of licensure by the licensing 969 authority of another state, district, territory, or country. 970 (e)âBeing convicted or found guilty of, or entering a plea 971 of nolo contendere to, regardless of adjudication, a crime in 972 any jurisdiction which directly relates to the practice of 973 dietetics and nutrition or nutrition counseling or the ability 974 to practice dietetics and nutrition or nutrition counseling. 975 (f)âMaking or filing a report or record that the licensee 976 knows to be false, willfully failing to file a report or record 977 required by state or federal law, willfully impeding or 978 obstructing such filing, or inducing another person to impede or 979 obstruct such filing. Such reports or records include only those 980 that are signed in the capacity of a licensed dietitian, 981 nutritionist, or dietitian/nutritionist or licensed nutrition 982 counselor. 983 (g)âAdvertising goods or services in a manner that is 984 fraudulent, false, deceptive, or misleading in form or content. 985 (h)âCommitting an act of fraud or deceit, or of negligence, 986 incompetency, or misconduct in the practice of dietetics, and 987 nutrition, or nutrition counseling. 988 (i)âPracticing with a revoked, suspended, inactive, or 989 delinquent license. 990 (j)âTreating or undertaking to treat human ailments by 991 means other than by the practice of dietetics, and nutrition, 992 practice or nutrition counseling. 993 (k)âFailing to maintain acceptable standards of practice as 994 set forth by the board and the council in rules adopted pursuant 995 to this part. 996 (l)âEngaging directly or indirectly in the dividing, 997 transferring, assigning, rebating, or refunding of fees received 998 for professional services, or profiting by means of a credit or 999 other valuable consideration, such as an unearned commission, 1000 discount, or gratuity, with any person referring a patient or 1001 with any relative or business associate of the referring person. 1002 Nothing in this part prohibits the members of any regularly and 1003 properly organized business entity that is composed of licensees 1004 under this part and recognized under the laws of this state from 1005 making any division of their total fees among themselves as they 1006 determine necessary. 1007 (m)âAdvertising, by or on behalf of a licensee under this 1008 part, any method of assessment or treatment which is 1009 experimental or without generally accepted scientific 1010 validation. 1011 (n)âViolating any provision of this chapter or chapter 456, 1012 or any rules adopted pursuant thereto. 1013 (2)âThe board may enter an order denying licensure or 1014 imposing any of the penalties in s. 456.072(2) against any 1015 applicant for licensure or licensee who is found guilty of 1016 violating any provision of subsection (1) of this section or who 1017 is found guilty of violating any provision of s. 456.072(1). 1018 (3)âThe department shall reissue the license of a 1019 disciplined dietitian, nutritionist, dietitian/nutritionist or 1020 nutrition counselor upon certification by the board that he or 1021 she the disciplined dietitian/nutritionist or nutrition 1022 counselor has complied with all of the terms and conditions set 1023 forth in the final order. 1024 Section 14.âSubsection (3) of section 381.00593, Florida 1025 Statutes, is amended to read: 1026 381.00593âPublic school volunteer health care practitioner 1027 program.â 1028 (3)âFor purposes of this section, the term âhealth care 1029 practitionerâ means a physician licensed under chapter 458; an 1030 osteopathic physician licensed under chapter 459; a chiropractic 1031 physician licensed under chapter 460; a podiatric physician 1032 licensed under chapter 461; an optometrist licensed under 1033 chapter 463; an advanced practice registered nurse, registered 1034 nurse, or licensed practical nurse licensed under part I of 1035 chapter 464; a pharmacist licensed under chapter 465; a dentist 1036 or dental hygienist licensed under chapter 466; a midwife 1037 licensed under chapter 467; a speech-language pathologist or 1038 audiologist licensed under part I of chapter 468; a dietitian or 1039 nutritionist dietitian/nutritionist licensed under part X of 1040 chapter 468; or a physical therapist licensed under chapter 486. 1041 Section 15.âSubsection (4) of section 501.0573, Florida 1042 Statutes, is amended to read: 1043 501.0573âWeight-loss provider requirements.âEach weight 1044 loss provider shall: 1045 (4)âProvide the name, address, and qualifications of the 1046 person who has reviewed and approved the weight-loss program 1047 according to s. 468.505(1)(i) s. 468.505(1)(j). 1048 Section 16.âSubsection (1) of section 501.0575, Florida 1049 Statutes, is amended to read: 1050 501.0575âWeight-Loss Consumer Bill of Rights.â 1051 (1)âThe Weight-Loss Consumer Bill of Rights shall consist 1052 of the following provisions: 1053 (A)âWARNING: RAPID WEIGHT LOSS MAY CAUSE SERIOUS HEALTH 1054 PROBLEMS. RAPID WEIGHT LOSS IS WEIGHT LOSS OF MORE THAN 1 1/2 1055 POUNDS TO 2 POUNDS PER WEEK OR WEIGHT LOSS OF MORE THAN 1 1056 PERCENT OF BODY WEIGHT PER WEEK AFTER THE SECOND WEEK OF 1057 PARTICIPATION IN A WEIGHT-LOSS PROGRAM. 1058 (B)âCONSULT YOUR PERSONAL PHYSICIAN BEFORE STARTING ANY 1059 WEIGHT-LOSS PROGRAM. 1060 (C)âONLY PERMANENT LIFESTYLE CHANGES, SUCH AS MAKING 1061 HEALTHFUL FOOD CHOICES AND INCREASING PHYSICAL ACTIVITY, PROMOTE 1062 LONG-TERM WEIGHT LOSS. 1063 (D)âQUALIFICATIONS OF THIS PROVIDER ARE AVAILABLE UPON 1064 REQUEST. 1065 (E)âYOU HAVE A RIGHT TO: 1066 1.âASK QUESTIONS ABOUT THE POTENTIAL HEALTH RISKS OF THIS 1067 PROGRAM AND ITS NUTRITIONAL CONTENT, PSYCHOLOGICAL SUPPORT, AND 1068 EDUCATIONAL COMPONENTS. 1069 2.âRECEIVE AN ITEMIZED STATEMENT OF THE ACTUAL OR ESTIMATED 1070 PRICE OF THE WEIGHT-LOSS PROGRAM, INCLUDING EXTRA PRODUCTS, 1071 SERVICES, SUPPLEMENTS, EXAMINATIONS, AND LABORATORY TESTS. 1072 3.âKNOW THE ACTUAL OR ESTIMATED DURATION OF THE PROGRAM. 1073 4.âKNOW THE NAME, ADDRESS, AND QUALIFICATIONS OF THE 1074 DIETITIAN OR NUTRITIONIST WHO HAS REVIEWED AND APPROVED THE 1075 WEIGHT-LOSS PROGRAM ACCORDING TO s. 468.505(1)(i) s. 1076 468.505(1)(j), FLORIDA STATUTES. 1077 Section 17.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.